Missouri, session 2026, HB1861.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 57.010 and 57.530, RSMo, are repealed and two new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 57.010 and 57.530, to read as follows:
57.010. 1. At the general election to be held in 1948, and at each general election
held every four years thereafter, the voters in every county in this state shall elect some
suitable person sheriff. No person shall be eligible for the office of sheriff who has been
convicted of a felony. Such person shall be a resident taxpayer and elector of said county,
shall have resided in said county for more than one whole year next before filing for said
office and shall be a person capable of efficient law enforcement. When any person shall be
elected sheriff, such person shall enter upon the discharge of the duties of such person's office
as chief law enforcement officer of that county on the first day of January next succeeding
said election.
2. No person shall be eligible for the office of sheriff who does not hold a valid peace
officer license pursuant to chapter 590. Any person filing for the office of sheriff shall have a
valid peace officer license at the time of filing for office. This subsection shall not apply to
the sheriff of any county of the first classification with a charter form of government with a
population over nine hundred thousand [or of any city not within a county].
3. The sheriff of any city not within a county shall be required to hold a valid peace
officer license pursuant to chapter 590 within two years of being elected as sheriff.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1861 2
57.530. The sheriff of the City of St. Louis shall, with the approval of a majority of
the circuit judges of the circuit court of said city, appoint as many deputies and assistants as
may be necessary to perform the duties of his or her office[, and]. The sheriff shall fix the
compensation for [their services] deputy assistants, which compensation, however, shall not
in any case exceed the annual rate of compensation fixed by the board of aldermen of the City
of St. Louis therefor. The annual compensation for sheriff's deputies shall be no less than
fifty thousand dollars per year.
✔